Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Grain Storage Establishment Licenses

251.410.
Definitions for KRS 251.420 to 251.510. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 1; 1972, ch. 347, § 1; 1982, ch. 262, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 389, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.420.
Duties of board. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.430.
License required — Exception — Renewal — Fee. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 3; 1972, ch. 347, § 2; 1984, ch. 389, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 2005, ch. 125, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 61, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2016 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.440.
Application for license as grain warehouse operator or grain dealer — Grounds for denial of new license or revocation of existing license — Noticing and hearing — Confidentiality of documents.

Application for license as a grain warehouse operator or grain dealer shall:

Set forth the name of the applicant, its principal officer, if a corporation, or the active members of a partnership if a partnership;

Identify the location or locations of the principal office or place of business and the locations in this state at which the applicant proposes to engage in this business;

Be accompanied by a bond as set forth in KRS

251.365

. The bond shall run to the Commonwealth of Kentucky and be for the benefit of all persons storing grain in the licensee’s warehouse or selling grain to the licensee; and

Be accompanied by a compilation of financial statements issued by a certified public accountant who has stated in writing whether he or she is independent from ownership and management, or one (1) of the documents identified in KRS 251.370(8), provided, however, a grain dealer license applicant whose total annual purchases in each of the last three (3) years did not exceed fifty thousand (50,000) bushels shall be exempt from the requirement set forth in this subsection.

The department may deny a license to any applicant or revoke the existing license if the applicant or licensee:

Furnishes false or misleading information or conceals a material fact on the application or other supporting documents;

Has been convicted of fraud or deceptive practice;

Is currently adjudicated incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Fails to maintain an asset to liability ratio of not less than one to one (1:1) or fails to post additional surety to cover the deficiency;

Violates a provision of this chapter; or

For other good cause shown.

Any person denied a license or whose license has been revoked for these reasons shall:

Be given written notice within thirty (30) working days of receipt of application or prior to revocation; and

May request a hearing by writing to the board. Upon request, a hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The department shall not approve an application for a grain warehouse operator’s license without first verifying that the application meets the requirements of this section.

The department shall not approve an application for a grain dealer’s license without first verifying that the application meets the requirements of this section.

The department shall keep confidential, and not disclose to anyone other than the applicant or licensee, the documents identified in this section and KRS

251.370

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 4; 1972, ch. 347, § 3; 1984, ch. 389, § 17, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 396, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 318, § 176, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 125, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2016 ch. 36, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 88, § 19, effective August 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bland, Insolvencies in Farming and Agribusinesses, 73 Ky. L.J. 795 (1984-85).

251.450.
Form of bond — Computation of amount. [Repealed.]

251.451.
Surety bond, certificate of deposit, letter of credit, or temporary surety required. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 16, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 396, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 61, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 21, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.460.
Information confidential.

All applications for license and documents accompanying license application shall be kept confidential and for use in licensing purposes only.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 7.

251.470.
Posting of license.

The license issued by the department shall be posted in the licensee’s place of business in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 6.

251.480.
Forward pricing and storage contracts — Licensee’s records — Receipts or scale tickets — Content — Bookkeeping system. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 8; 1972, ch. 347, § 5; 1982, ch. 252, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.485.
Forward pricing (delayed pricing) contracts. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 76, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.490.
Semiannual inspection — Special provisions for licensees short of facilities. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 9; 1972, ch. 347, § 6; 1984, ch. 389, § 18, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.500.
Changes that make license issued under this chapter invalid — Duties of licensee when change occurs — Audit and examination authorized — Changes that invalidate licenses issued under this chapter.

A license issued under the authority of this chapter shall become invalid upon:

The change of management;

Cessation of operations;

Change of partners in a partnership;

Change of corporate structure of a corporation;

Failure to remit license fees or fines; or

A sale.

A licensee shall immediately notify the department as to any change and shall deliver his license to the department together with a notarized statement setting forth the arrangements made with depositors for final disposition of grain in storage and for fulfilling any current obligations.

If there is to be a successor, the successor shall apply for a new license.

If there is a change of management or cessation of operations, the department may cause an audit and examination to be made. In these cases, all records required in this chapter shall be available to the department until the department is satisfied that all obligations have been met.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 10; 1972, ch. 347, § 7; 2005, ch. 125, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2019 ch. 88, § 20, effective August 1, 2019.

251.510.
Board hearings. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 252, § 11; 1974, ch. 315, § 35; 1980, ch. 114, § 55, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 177, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.520.
Departments to enter into agreements with other governments to satisfy inspection requirements. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 125, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.